California, session 20252026, AB2291.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33319.7 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 33319.6, to read:33319.7. (a) The department shall conduct a study on nonconsensual artificial intimate images involving pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. The study shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) A summary of the resources available for schools regarding nonconsensual artificial intimate images.(2) The number of incidents involving nonconsensual artificial intimate images of pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, reported to local educational agencies and local law enforcement agencies since January 1, 2024, the responses to those incidents, and the outcomes of those reported incidents.(3) The effects of nonconsensual artificial intimate images on pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(4) Recommended revisions to school policies and procedures to ensure compliance with Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).(5) A summary of current policies and procedures used by schools to respond to incidents involving nonconsensual artificial intimate images.(b) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall complete and submit the study described in subdivision (a) to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature.(c) (1) A study to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2032.